Utah statutes.
63G-6-1002 (Repealed 05/01/13).   Felony to offer emolument.

A person who is interested in any way in the sale of any supplies, services, construction, real property, or insurance to the state of Utah or any political subdivision thereof, is guilty of a felony if the person gives or offers to give any emolument, gratuity, contribution, loan or reward, or any promise thereof to any person acting as a procurement officer, or who in any official capacity participates in the procurement of such supplies, services, construction, real property, or insurance, whether it is given for the person's own use or for the use or benefit of any other person or organization.



Repealed by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

